Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 568.1 of Title 57, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Corrections shall make the following


information regarding inmates available to the public:


1. Any work, education, or other program the inmate has


participated in; and


2. Any disciplinary action the inmate has received.


B. The Department of Corrections shall promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.

Req. No. 2402 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2402 CN 1/15/2026 8:50:52 AM











































Req. No. 2402 Page 2